Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 8

State Forests

11-4-801. Basic system of state forests authorized.

The department of agriculture, through the division, is authorized to establish and manage a system of state forests to provide for the multiple use management of the various renewable and nonrenewable resources such that those resources are utilized in the combination that best meets the needs of the people of Tennessee. The system shall include those lands which the division deems suitable for public forestry purposes.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 39.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1991, ch. 205, § 1 provided that “notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any electric utility company in any county having a population of not less than six thousand eight hundred seventy-five (6,875) nor more than six thousand nine hundred seventy-five (6,975) according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census shall be authorized to erect an antenna on a lookout tower site located in such county. Such installation shall be in accordance with the rules regarding safe installation of antenna promulgated by the division of forestry. The commissioner of environment and conservation has the authority to ensure that such antenna is properly installed and maintained. The installation of such antenna shall be a Class A installation and the fees shall be in accordance with those set for Class A installation by the department of environment and conservation.”

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction and Maintenance of County Roads in State Forests. OAG 15-50, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (6/8/15).

11-4-802. Comprehensive state forest system plan.

The division will prepare and periodically revise a comprehensive state forest system plan that describes policies, procedures, methodologies, and management guidelines for implementation of the state forest system.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 40.

11-4-803. Cooperation with executive director of wildlife resources agency.

The state forester, by and with the approval of the commissioner of agriculture, shall cooperate with the executive director of the wildlife resources agency in furtherance of the policy of this state to protect and propagate wild animals, wild birds and fish, and, by and with the consent of the commissioner, shall designate any state forest a game refuge or preserve, and is authorized to cooperate with the executive director of the wildlife resources agency in developing such state forests for the purpose of preserving and propagating the wildlife of this state.

Acts 1937, ch. 280, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.21 (Williams, § 630.24); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 4, 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-416; Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 41; T.C.A., § 11-4-116.

11-4-804. Acquisition of state forests authorized.

The division of forestry is authorized and empowered to acquire by purchase, gift, lease, or otherwise, and hold title thereto in the name of the state, lands to be known as state forests.

Acts 1937, ch. 280, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.11 (Williams, § 630.12); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-406; Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 42; T.C.A., § 11-4-106.

11-4-805. Procuring sale and title to tax delinquent lands.

The state forester or the state forester's authorized representatives are empowered and authorized to examine delinquent tax lists in the hands of the trustees of the various counties of the state, as well as the commissioner of revenue, and shall cooperate with the county trustees, the commissioner of revenue, or any back tax attorney, in obtaining the sale of land which in the opinion of the state forester is suitable for state conservation, and in acquiring title to such lands in the name of the state and in the dedication of the same to state forests or other conservation purposes.

Acts 1937, ch. 280, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.12 (Williams, § 630.13); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-407; Acts 1986, ch. 652, §§ 43, 47; T.C.A., § 11-4-107.

11-4-806. Management of lands acquired through tax sale.

When the state has acquired title to lands sold to satisfy liens for delinquent taxes, and same have been proclaimed and dedicated by the governor to the public use as state forests, the state forester shall have the same authority and power to administer and manage such lands as the state forester does lands which have been acquired by purchase, gift or otherwise.

Acts 1937, ch. 280, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.13 (Williams, § 630.14); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-408; Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 44, 47; T.C.A., § 11-4-108.

11-4-807. Free use of timber from state forests — Designated free-use areas — Notice — State immunity from liability.

As used in this section, “free-use area” means an area where residents of this state may remove downed and dead timber from a state forest, without cost, for their own personal use as firewood for home heating and cooking; provided, that none of the firewood is offered for sale.

The state forester must designate portions or all of each state forest as free-use areas where such designation is compatible with the comprehensive state forest system plan prepared under § 11-4-802.

Removing downed and dead timber in designated free-use areas shall be in accordance with rules promulgated by the state forester and approved by the commissioner to prevent fires, minimize damage to live trees and other resources, and to avoid confusion and safety risks among users.

The state forester must publish notice of any designation made under subsection (b) on the department's website in a manner approved by the commissioner.

This state and its officers and employees shall not be liable to any person for any personal injury, property damage, or death sustained or caused by an individual while removing downed and dead timber in a designated free-use area unless conduct of the state or a state officer or employee that directly caused the personal injury, property damage, or death was intentional tortious conduct or an act or omission constituting gross negligence.

Acts 2018, ch. 730, § 1.